Rhode Island, session 2025, SB850.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-82-16 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-82 entitled "Farmland
Preservation Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-82-16. Charges for utility extension.
(a) No city, town, quasi-municipal corporation, or public corporation may assess the owner
of an agricultural operation having frontage on a public roadway for the extension of water and
sewer utilities past the property.
(b)"Connection fees", for purposes of this section, mean any impact fee or connection fee
or any other fee designed to circumvent the prohibition contained in this section. "Connection fee"
shall not include any administrative, overhead, or equipment fee or the construction costs related
to extension of or connection to a water main.
(c) No city, town, quasi-municipal corporation or public corporation shall assess the owner
of an agricultural operation as defined in § 2-23-4, or agricultural land as defined in § 42-82-2, in
existence as of July 1, 2025 and having frontage on a public roadway, a connection fee for the
extension of water utilities past the property. The protection afforded by this section shall be null
and void and the assessments made if the owner of the agricultural operation develops or sells to
other than a qualifying agricultural operation the property or farmland.
(b)(d) The owner of the agricultural operation may only be charged for the extension of
sewer utilities if the owner has requested the utility extension. The agricultural operation may tie

into any sewer utility extension made past that property for the normal cost of tie-in and no cost for
the infrastructure improvement except for its base usable charge. The protection afforded by this
section shall be null and void and the assessments made if the owner of the agricultural operation
develops or sells to other than a qualifying agricultural operation the property or farmland within
twenty (20) years of the date the utility extensions were operational.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002471/SUB A
========
LC002471/SUB A - Page 2 of 3